Alabama, session 2026rs, HB627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 36-7-20, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§36-7-20
(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 36-7-21,
the amount allowable to an individual traveling inside the
State of Alabama in the service of the state or any of its
departments, institutions, boards, bureaus, commissions,
Page 1

departments, institutions, boards, bureaus, commissions,
HB627 INTRODUCED
councils, committees, or other like agencies for expenses
other than transportation may be fixed by the Governor at not
less than seventy-five dollars ($75) per day, and this amount
shall be uniform in operation as to all individuals traveling
within the state on official business under this section,
provided, no individual shall be entitled to reimbursement
under both this section and under Section 36-7-21 for any
travel segment.
(b) No travel allowance shall be paid for a trip of
less than six hours' duration. For travel that does not
require an overnight stay, the traveler shall be paid a meal
allowance of 15 17.5 percent of the regular per diem rate for
a trip of from six to 12 hours' duration, and for travel in
excess of 12 hours' duration, the traveler shall be paid one
meal allowance and one-fourth of the per diem allowance.
(c) The per diem allowance shall not be paid to an
employee stationed at the same place in the state for a period
in excess of two consecutive months. After two consecutive
months the amount of the allowance shall be reduced to 75
percent of the regular per diem rate per day.
(d) This section shall not apply to examiners or other
individuals designated by the Commissioner of Insurance to
examine or cause to be examined the domestic insurance
corporations qualified in this state when the expense incurred
by those individuals shall be is paid by, collected, or
received from the corporations examined under Section 27-2-25.
(e) This section shall be optional with the employing
agency in those instances where the employee is required to
Page 2

agency in those instances where the employee is required to
HB627 INTRODUCED
attend training sessions, schools, seminars, or other like
group functions at a facility when it would serve the best
interests of both the state and the employee, or in those
instances when the employee is assigned to assist in
suppressing on-going natural disaster situations, or other
emergencies. In those cases, the cost of meals and per diem
may be paid as set forth herein in this section or by the
employing agency of the state directly to the contract
facility furnishing the service, but the costs of these
services shall not exceed the amount allowable to the
individual employee for in-state travel.
(f) For purposes of applying this section to members of
the Legislature, each of the following shall apply:
(1) The presiding officer of the house to which the
member belongs shall determine if the travel is in the service
of the state.
(2) In connection with the same travel, members of the
Legislature shall receive per diem under this section except
in either of the following instances:
a. For attendance on special or regular session days or
committee meeting days of the Legislature when otherwise
compensated pursuant to law.
b. For attendance on interim committee meeting days of
the Legislature when otherwise compensated pursuant to law.
(3) "Travel" means a departure from the place of
residence of the member of the Legislature."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3